New Jersey, session 221, S1591.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Department of Education shall establish and maintain a comprehensive website concerning educational programs and resources available for students classified as eligible for special education programs and services.  The purpose of the website shall be to provide current and complete information on disability resources in one location that is easily accessible to the public.  The website shall include, but not be limited to, information on the following: approved in-State and out-of-State private schools for students with disabilities; other approved receiving schools that provide programs for students with disabilities, including educational services commissions, jointure commissions, regional day schools, county special services school districts, and public college operated programs for students with disabilities; special education programs operated by school districts that also serve out-of-district students; publicly or privately operated educational programs for special education students in the State that are specialized for particular disabilities; assistive technologies for students with disabilities; and support resources, including public and nonprofit organizations, that serve students with disabilities and their families. b.    The information contained on the website established under subsection a. of this section shall be electronically searchable by multiple criteria including keyword, type of disability, and geographic location of the educational program. c.     To assist in developing and maintaining the website, the department shall consult with the New Jersey State Special Education Advisory Council established pursuant to N.J.S.18A:46-2.  The department shall work on a continuing basis with the council to ensure that the website contains complete and current information. d.    The website established by the department pursuant to this section shall be updated on at least an annual basis. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.